Maryland, session 2026, HB1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–320 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–321.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–320.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1103*

HOUSE BILL 1103
THE FREEDOM FLAG, DESIGNED AND CREATED BY RICHARD NICHOLAS
MELITO OF RICHMOND, VIRGINIA, TO MEMORIALIZE THE VICTIMS OF THE EVENTS
OF SEPTEMBER 11, 2001, IS THE STATE SYMBOL OF REMEMBRANCE FOR THE
ATTACKS OF SEPTEMBER 11.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
September 11, 2026.